Hawaii, session 2025, HB953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 329D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§329D-    Unauthorized operation of a dispensary; criminal penalty.  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a dispensary or engage in the production, manufacture, or sale of cannabis or manufactured cannabis products without a license from the department pursuant to this chapter. (b) No person shall intentionally or knowingly provide services to support an unlicensed person or entity or unlicensed activities pursuant to this chapter. (c) No person shall intentionally or knowingly operate any search platform, web hosting services, social media platform, or other entity that posts information advertising the sale of cannabis products by an unlicensed person or entity engaged in the production, manufacture, or sale of cannabis or manufactured cannabis products without a license pursuant to this chapter. (d) The department shall issue a cease and desist notice to any person who violates subsection (a), (b), or (c). (e) Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be guilty of a class C felony." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________